Wyoming statutes. Title 14 Children
Article 1. Wyoming Children's Trust Fund

§ 14-8-101.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Wyoming Children’s Trust Fund Act.”

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 214, § 1.

§ 14-8-102.
Legislative declaration.

The legislature hereby finds that child abuse and neglect are a threat to the family unit and impose major expenses on society. The legislature further finds that there is a need to assist private and public agencies in identifying and establishing programs for the prevention of child abuse and neglect.

It is the purpose of this article to promote prevention and education programs that are designed to lessen the occurrence and reoccurrence of child abuse and neglect and to reduce the need for state intervention in child abuse and neglect prevention and education.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 214, § 1.

§ 14-8-103.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Board” means the Wyoming children’s trust fund board created in W.S.

14-8-104

;

“Child abuse” means any act which reasonably may be construed to fall under the definition of “abuse” or “neglect” under W.S. 14-3-202(a)(ii) or (vii);

“Prevention program” means a program of direct child abuse prevention services to a child, parent or guardian and includes research or education programs related to the prevention of child abuse. The prevention program may be classified as a primary prevention program when it is available to the community on a voluntary basis and as a secondary prevention program when it is directed toward groups of individuals who have been identified as high risk;

“Recipient” means and is limited to a nonprofit or public organization which receives a grant from the income account created in W.S. 14-8-106(b);

“Trust fund” means the Wyoming children’s trust fund created in W.S. 14-8-106(a);

“Income account” means the Wyoming children’s income account created by W.S. 14-8-106(b).

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 214, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2007, ch. 215, § 1; 2019 ch. 114, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(iv), substituted “income account created in W.S.

14-8-106

(b)” for “trust fund created in W.S.

14-8-106

,” in (a)(v), substituted “14-8-106(a)” for “14-8-106,” made related changes, and added (a)(vi).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 14-8-104.
Wyoming children's trust fund board; creation; members.

There is created a Wyoming children’s trust fund board. The board shall consist of eight (8) members, as follows:

The director of the department of family services or the director’s designee;

The state superintendent of public instruction;

Five (5) persons appointed by the governor and confirmed by the senate who are knowledgeable in the area of child abuse prevention and are representative of any one (1) or more of the following areas:

Law enforcement;

Medicine;

Law;

Business;

Mental health;

Domestic relations;

Child abuse prevention;

Education;

Social work; and

Parent organizations.

The director of the department of health or the director’s designee.

Each appointed member of the board shall serve for a term of three (3) years. A vacancy on the board shall be filled for the balance of the unexpired term.

The board shall meet regularly. Members shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the performance of their duties in the manner and amounts provided by law for state employees.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 214, § 1; 2005, ch. 242, § 2; 2018 ch. 74, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2005 amendment,

deleted “or his designee” at the end of (a)(ii).

Laws 2005, ch. 242, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 11, 2005.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a), substituted “eight (8)” for “seven (7)”; in (a)(i), deleted “executive” preceding “director”; added (a)(iv); and made stylistic changes.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subparagraph (a)(iii)(I) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 14-8-105.
Powers and duties of the board.

The board shall:

Provide for the coordination and exchange of information on the establishment and maintenance of prevention programs;

Develop and publicize criteria regarding grants from the trust fund, including the duration of grants and any requirements for matching funds which are received from the trust fund;

Review and monitor the expenditure of monies by recipients;

Prepare an annual report to the joint appropriations interim committee on the board’s activities which include periodic evaluations of the effectiveness of the prevention programs funded by the trust fund;

Accept grants from the federal government as well as solicit and accept contributions, grants, gifts, bequests and donations from individuals, private organizations and foundations for credit to the trust fund or the income account as directed by the terms of the contribution, grant, gift, bequest or donation;

Expend monies of the income account for the establishment, promotion and maintenance of prevention programs, for operational expenses of the board and to increase the balance of the trust fund corpus;

Exercise any other powers or perform any other duties which are consistent with the purposes for which the board was created and which are reasonably necessary for the fulfillment of the board’s responsibilities;

Establish a classification system for potential recipients based upon need and shall award grants to those classified most needy.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 214, § 1; 1997, ch. 31, § 2; 2019 ch. 114, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(v), added “for credit to the trust fund or the income account as directed by the terms of the contribution, grant, gift, bequest or donation” at the end, in (a)(vi), substituted “income account” for “trust fund,” added “and to increase the balance of the trust fund corpus” at the end, and made related changes.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 14-8-106.
Wyoming children’s trust fund and income account; creation; source of funds.

There is created the Wyoming children’s trust fund. The fund shall be administered by the board and shall consist of monies appropriated or designated to the fund by law and all monies collected by the board pursuant to W.S. 14-8-105(a)(v) for credit to the trust fund. Funds deposited within the trust fund are intended to be inviolate and constitute a perpetual trust account. The state treasurer shall invest the account as authorized by law and in a manner to obtain the highest net return possible consistent with the preservation of the trust fund corpus.

There is created the Wyoming children’s income account. The account shall be administered by the board and shall consist of monies appropriated or designated to the account by law and all monies collected by the board pursuant to W.S. 14-8-105(a)(v) for credit to the income account. The state treasurer shall credit annually to the income account the income earned from investment of the trust fund corpus. All funds in the income account at the end of a biennium shall remain in the account for expenditure as authorized in this article.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 214, § 1; 1996, ch. 112, § 2; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2008, ch. 113, § 2; 2019 ch. 114, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in the first sentence, deleted “within the trust and agency fund an account which shall be referred to” after “created,” and in the second sentence substituted “fund” for “account.”

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “W.S. 9-4-715(a), (d) and (e)” for “W.S.

9-4-711

”.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, designated former undesignated paragraph as present (a), and substituted “the board pursuant to W.S. 14-8-105(a)(v) for credit to the trust fund. Funds deposited within the trust fund are intended to be inviolate and constitute a perpetual trust account. The state treasurer shall invest the account” for “the board from federal grants and other contributions, grants, gifts, bequests and donations. The monies shall be transmitted to the state treasurer for credit to the trust fund and shall be invested by the state treasurer,” added “trust fund” preceding “corpus,” deleted the last sentence, which read: “Any interest earned on the investment or deposit of monies in the fund shall also remain in the fund and shall not be credited to the general fund”; and added (b).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in the last sentence of (a), substituted "by law" for "under W.S. 9-4-715(a), (d) and (e)" and added "net" following "highest."

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2019, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “(a) On July 1, 2019, the state auditor shall transfer funds from the Wyoming children's trust fund created in
W.S. 14-8-106(a) to the Wyoming children's income account created in
W.S. 14-8-106(b) as follows:

“(i) Any unexpended income earned from investment of the Wyoming children's trust fund attributable to the fiscal year 2019, as calculated by the state treasurer;

“(ii) Any monies received from the federal government and any contributions, grants, gifts, bequests and donations from individuals, private organizations and foundations collected by the Wyoming children's trust fund board on or before June 30, 2019.”

Laws 2019, ch. 114, § 4, provides: “Subject to available funding, all unexpended funds appropriated on or before July 1, 2019 for the Wyoming Children's Trust Fund Act for fiscal years 2019 and 2020 shall be paid from the Wyoming children's income account created in
W.S. 14-8-106(b).”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 14-8-107.
Disbursement of grants from the income account.

Grants may be awarded from the income account to provide monies for the start-up, continuance or expansion of prevention programs, to provide educational and public informational seminar and to study and evaluate prevention programs.

and (c) Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 114, § 2.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 214, § 1; 2018 ch. 74, § 2, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 114, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, repealed former (b)(ii), which read: “Upon certification by the state treasurer that the assets in the trust fund exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000.00), no further monies shall be collected for the trust fund pursuant to W.S. 35-1-428(b). Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to prohibit the continued collection of monies for the trust fund pursuant to W.S. 14-8-105(a)(v).”

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 114 § 1, effective July 1, 2019, in (a), substituted “awarded from the income account” for “awarded.”

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 114 § 2, effective July 1, 2019, repealed (b) and (c), which read: “(b) The board shall have discretion in determining the amount of money to be awarded under each grant, except that: (i) Until the total amount of assets in the trust fund exceeds five million dollars ($5,000,000.00), not more than one-half (1/2) of the money credited to the trust fund each year plus any interest credited to the trust fund during the previous year shall be available for disbursement or expenditure by the board; (c) Upon certification by the state treasurer that the assets in the trust fund exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000.00), only the interest credited to the trust fund, together with any monies collected for the fund pursuant to W.S. 14-8-105(a)(v), shall be available for disbursement or expenditure by the board.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

§ 14-8-108.
Biennial audit.

The director of the department of audit or his designee shall audit the trust fund biennially. Copies of the audit shall be provided to the legislature.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 214, § 1; 1995, ch. 199, § 1.